Florida, session 2026, SB374.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 29 30 Section 1.âParagraphs (e) and (f) of subsection (4) of 31 section 458.347, Florida Statutes, are amended, and paragraph 32 (l) is added to that subsection, to read: 33 458.347âPhysician assistants.â 34 (4)âPERFORMANCE OF PHYSICIAN ASSISTANTS.â 35 (e)âA supervising physician may delegate to a fully 36 licensed physician assistant the authority to prescribe or 37 dispense any medication used in the supervising physicianâs 38 practice unless such medication is listed on the formulary 39 created pursuant to paragraph (f). A fully licensed physician 40 assistant may only prescribe or dispense such medication only 41 under the following conditions circumstances: 42 1.âA physician assistant must clearly identify to the 43 patient that he or she is a physician assistant. 44 2.âThe supervising physician must notify the department of 45 his or her intent to delegate, on a department-approved form, 46 before delegating such authority and of any change in 47 prescriptive privileges of the physician assistant. Authority to 48 dispense may be delegated only by a supervising physician who is 49 registered as a dispensing practitioner in compliance with s. 50 465.0276. 51 3.âA fully licensed physician assistant may procure medical 52 devices and drugs unless the medication is listed on the 53 formulary created pursuant to paragraph (f). 54 4.âThe physician assistant must complete a minimum of 10 55 continuing medical education hours in the specialty practice in 56 which the physician assistant has prescriptive privileges with 57 each licensure renewal. Three of the 10 hours must consist of a 58 continuing education course on the safe and effective 59 prescribing of controlled substance medications which is offered 60 by a statewide professional association of physicians in this 61 state accredited to provide educational activities designated 62 for the American Medical Association Physicianâs Recognition 63 Award Category 1 credit, designated by the American Academy of 64 Physician Assistants as a Category 1 credit, or designated by 65 the American Osteopathic Association as a Category 1-A credit. 66 5.âThe prescription may be in paper or electronic form but 67 must comply with ss. 456.0392(1) and 456.42(1) and chapter 499 68 and must contain the physician assistantâs name, address, and 69 telephone number and the name of each of his or her supervising 70 physicians. Unless it is a drug or drug sample dispensed by the 71 physician assistant, the prescription must be filled in a 72 pharmacy permitted under chapter 465 and must be dispensed in 73 that pharmacy by a pharmacist licensed under chapter 465. 74 6.âThe physician assistant must note the prescription or 75 dispensing of medication in the appropriate medical record. 76 (f)1.âThe council shall establish a formulary of medicinal 77 drugs that a fully licensed physician assistant having 78 prescribing authority under this section or s. 459.022 may not 79 prescribe. The formulary must include general anesthetics and 80 radiographic contrast materials and must limit the prescription 81 of Schedule II controlled substances as listed in s. 893.03 to a 82 7-day supply or, in the case of Schedule II psychiatric mental 83 health controlled substances, a 30-day supply. If the 84 prescription is for a formulary must also restrict the 85 prescribing of Schedule II psychiatric mental health controlled 86 substance substances for a child children younger than 18 years 87 of age to a 14-day supply, provided the physician assistant must 88 be is under the supervision of a pediatrician, a family practice 89 physician, an internal medicine physician, or a psychiatrist. 90 2.âIn establishing the formulary, the council shall consult 91 with a pharmacist licensed under chapter 465, but not licensed 92 under this chapter or chapter 459, who shall be selected by the 93 State Surgeon General. 94 3.âOnly the council shall add to, delete from, or modify 95 the formulary. Any person who requests an addition, a deletion, 96 or a modification of a medicinal drug listed on such formulary 97 has the burden of proof to show cause why such addition, 98 deletion, or modification should be made. 99 4.âThe boards shall adopt the formulary required by this 100 paragraph, and each addition, deletion, or modification to the 101 formulary, by rule. Notwithstanding any provision of chapter 120 102 to the contrary, the formulary rule shall be effective 60 days 103 after the date it is filed with the Secretary of State. Upon 104 adoption of the formulary, the department shall mail a copy of 105 such formulary to each fully licensed physician assistant having 106 prescribing authority under this section or s. 459.022, and to 107 each pharmacy licensed by the state. The boards shall establish, 108 by rule, a fee not to exceed $200 to fund the provisions of 109 paragraph (e) and this paragraph. 110 (l)âIf the Governor issues an executive order or a 111 proclamation declaring a state of emergency pursuant to s. 112 252.36, fully licensed physician assistants holding an active, 113 unrestricted license to practice in this state may render 114 medical services without physician supervision in any county 115 covered by the executive order or proclamation for the duration 116 of the declared state of emergency. However, out-of-state 117 physician assistants registered to provide telehealth services 118 in this state and physician assistants holding a temporary 119 certificate to practice in an area of critical need are not 120 authorized to practice without physician supervision under this 121 paragraph. All services rendered under this paragraph must 122 otherwise comply with the requirements of this section and the 123 rules adopted pursuant hereto. 124 Section 2.âParagraph (e) of subsection (4) of section 125 459.022, Florida Statutes, is amended, and paragraph (k) is 126 added to that subsection, to read: 127 459.022âPhysician assistants.â 128 (4)âPERFORMANCE OF PHYSICIAN ASSISTANTS.â 129 (e)âA supervising physician may delegate to a fully 130 licensed physician assistant the authority to prescribe or 131 dispense any medication used in the supervising physicianâs 132 practice unless such medication is listed on the formulary 133 created pursuant to s. 458.347. A fully licensed physician 134 assistant may only prescribe or dispense such medication only 135 under the following conditions circumstances: 136 1.âA physician assistant must clearly identify to the 137 patient that she or he is a physician assistant. 138 2.âThe supervising physician must notify the department of 139 her or his intent to delegate, on a department-approved form, 140 before delegating such authority and of any change in 141 prescriptive privileges of the physician assistant. Authority to 142 dispense may be delegated only by a supervising physician who is 143 registered as a dispensing practitioner in compliance with s. 144 465.0276. 145 3.âA fully licensed physician assistant may procure medical 146 devices and drugs unless the medication is listed on the 147 formulary created pursuant to s. 458.347(4)(f). 148 4.âThe physician assistant must complete a minimum of 10 149 continuing medical education hours in the specialty practice in 150 which the physician assistant has prescriptive privileges with 151 each licensure renewal. Three of the 10 hours must consist of a 152 continuing education course on the safe and effective 153 prescribing of controlled substance medications which is offered 154 by a provider that has been approved by the American Academy of 155 Physician Assistants and which is designated for the American 156 Medical Association Physicianâs Recognition Award Category 1 157 credit, designated by the American Academy of Physician 158 Assistants as a Category 1 credit, or designated by the American 159 Osteopathic Association as a Category 1-A credit. 160 5.âThe prescription may be in paper or electronic form but 161 must comply with ss. 456.0392(1) and 456.42(1) and chapter 499 162 and must contain the physician assistantâs name, address, and 163 telephone number and the name of each of his or her supervising 164 physicians. Unless it is a drug or drug sample dispensed by the 165 physician assistant, the prescription must be filled in a 166 pharmacy permitted under chapter 465, and must be dispensed in 167 that pharmacy by a pharmacist licensed under chapter 465. 168 6.âThe physician assistant must note the prescription or 169 dispensing of medication in the appropriate medical record. 170 (k)âIf the Governor issues an executive order or a 171 proclamation declaring a state of emergency pursuant to s. 172 252.36, a fully licensed physician assistant holding an active, 173 unrestricted license to practice in this state may render 174 medical services without physician supervision in any county 175 covered by the executive order or proclamation for the duration 176 of the declared state of emergency. However, out-of-state 177 physician assistants registered to provide telehealth services 178 in this state and physician assistants holding a temporary 179 certificate to practice in an area of critical need are not 180 authorized to practice without physician supervision under this 181 paragraph. All services rendered under this paragraph must 182 otherwise comply with the requirements of this section and the 183 rules adopted pursuant hereto. 184 Section 3.âPresent subsection (7) of section 464.012, 185 Florida Statutes, is redesignated as subsection (8), a new 186 subsection (7) is added to that section, and paragraph (a) of 187 subsection (6) of that section is amended, to read: 188 464.012âLicensure of advanced practice registered nurses; 189 fees; controlled substance prescribing.â 190 (6)(a)âThe board shall establish a committee to recommend a 191 formulary of controlled substances that an advanced practice 192 registered nurse may not prescribe or may prescribe only for 193 specific uses or in limited quantities. The committee must be 194 composed consist of three advanced practice registered nurses 195 licensed under this section, recommended by the board; three 196 physicians licensed under chapter 458 or chapter 459 who have 197 work experience with advanced practice registered nurses, 198 recommended by the Board of Medicine; and a pharmacist licensed 199 under chapter 465 who is a doctor of pharmacy, recommended by 200 the Board of Pharmacy. The committee may recommend an evidence 201 based formulary applicable to all advanced practice registered 202 nurses which is limited by specialty certification, is limited 203 to approved uses of controlled substances, or is subject to 204 other similar restrictions the committee finds are necessary to 205 protect the health, safety, and welfare of the public. The 206 formulary must restrict the prescribing of psychiatric mental 207 health controlled substances for children younger than 18 years 208 of age to a 30-day supply advanced practice registered nurses 209 who also are psychiatric nurses as defined in s. 394.455. The 210 formulary must also limit the prescribing of Schedule II 211 controlled substances as listed in s. 893.03 to a 7-day supply, 212 except that such restriction does not apply to controlled 213 substances that are psychiatric medications prescribed by 214 psychiatric nurses as defined in s. 394.455. 215 (7)âIf the Governor issues an executive order or a 216 proclamation declaring a state of emergency pursuant to s. 217 252.36, fully licensed advanced practice registered nurses 218 holding an active, unrestricted license to practice in this 219 state may render medical services without physician supervision 220 in any county covered by the executive order or proclamation for 221 the duration of the declared state of emergency. However, out 222 of-state advanced practice registered nurses registered to 223 provide telehealth services in this state and advanced practice 224 registered nurses holding a temporary certificate to practice in 225 an area of critical need are not authorized to practice without 226 physician supervision under this paragraph. All services 227 rendered under this paragraph must otherwise comply with the 228 requirements of this part and the rules adopted pursuant hereto. 229 Section 4.âThis act shall take effect July 1, 2026.